California statutes. Public Resources Code
 pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the subaccount.

(2) The department shall approve only those loan applications that demonstrate the applicant’s ability to repay the loan.

 (3) Priority for funding shall be given to projects for circular recycling programs that result in the product being recycled into a product that is also recyclable, as determined by the department, or that has a minimum lifespan of 10 or more years. The department shall establish project eligibility criteria and make it available to the public in order to achieve the intent of the Legislature.

(4) A loan shall not be provided for a project that will result in the production of fuels or energy through transformation, engineered municipal solid waste conversion, or other disposal activities.

(5) The Department of Finance may audit the expenditure of the proceeds of a loan made pursuant to Section 42023.1 and this section.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(2) The repeal of this section pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not extinguish any loan obligation or the authority of the state to pursue appropriate actions for the collection of a loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 38.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.    Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.5.

(a) The department shall, as part of the annual report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 40507, include a report on the performance of the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Program, including the number and size of loans made, characteristics of loan recipients, projected loan demand, and the cost of administering the program.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the date on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 12.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.    Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42023.6.

(a) The department shall encourage applicants to seek participation from private financial institutions or other public agencies. For purposes of enabling the department and local agencies to comply with Sections 40051 and 41780, the department may participate, in an amount not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), in the Capital Access Loan Program as provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 44559) of Chapter 1 of Division 27 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For purposes of participating in the Capital Access Loan Program, as specified in subdivision (a), or in a program that leverages subaccount funds, the department may operate both inside and outside the
 recycling market development zones.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and as of January 1, 2032, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 2032, deletes or extends the date on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(2) The repeal of this section pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not extinguish any loan obligation or the authority of the state to pursue appropriate actions for the collection of a loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 13.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2031.    Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42024.

The department, the Treasurer, and other appropriate state agencies shall, to the extent feasible and as appropriate, coordinate activities that will leverage financing for market development projects and encourage joint activities to strengthen markets for recycled materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 39.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42025.

The department shall update its regulations relating to the implementation of this article. Any regulation promulgated pursuant to this article and in effect on September 1, 2021, shall remain in effect until the department revises or repeals that regulation or January 1, 2022, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 40.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Pharmaceutical and Sharps Waste Stewardship [42030. - 42036.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42030. - 42030.]

42030.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Authorized collection site” means a location where an authorized collector operates a secure collection receptacle for collecting covered products.

(b) “Authorized collector” means a person or entity that has entered into an agreement with a program operator to collect covered drugs, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) A person or entity that is registered with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration and that qualifies under federal law to modify that registration to collect controlled substances for the purpose of destruction.

(2) A law enforcement agency.

(3) A retail pharmacy that offers drug take-back services in compliance with Article 9.1 (commencing with Section 1776) of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) “Controlled substance” means a substance listed under Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code or Section 812 or 813 of Title 21 of the United States Code, or any successor section.

(d) “Cosmetic” means an article, or a component of an article, intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, sprayed, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance. “Cosmetic” includes articles with or without expiration dates.

(e) (1) “Covered drug” means a drug, including a brand name or generic drug, sold, offered for sale, or dispensed in the State of California in any form, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Prescription and nonprescription drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 355) or Section 351 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262).

(B) A drug marketed pursuant to an over-the-counter drug monograph.

(C) A drug in a medical device, or a combination product containing a drug and a medical device.

(2) “Covered drug” does not include
 any of the following:

(A) Vitamins or supplements.

(B) Herbal-based remedies and homeopathic drugs, products, or remedies.

(C) Cosmetics, soap, with or without germicidal agents, laundry detergent, bleach, household cleaning products, shampoos, sunscreens, toothpaste, lip balm, antiperspirants, or any other personal care product that is regulated as both a cosmetic and a nonprescription drug under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.).

(D) A drug for which a pharmaceutical product stewardship program or drug takeback program is provided in the state as part of a United States Food and Drug Administration managed risk evaluation and mitigation strategy under 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355-1.

(E) Biological drug products, as defined by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 262(i)(1), including those products currently approved in the state under a new drug application that will be deemed to be licensed under Section 351 of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262) pursuant to Section 7002(e) of the federal Biologics Price Competition and Innovation Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-148).

(F) A medical device, or a component part or accessory of a medical device, if it does not contain a covered drug.

(G) Drugs that are used for animal medicines, including, but not limited to, parasiticide products for animals.

(H) Dialysate drugs or other saline solutions required to perform kidney dialysis.

(f) (1) (A) “Covered entity” means the manufacturer of covered products that are sold in or into the state.

(B) If no entity that meets the definition in subparagraph (A) is in the state, “covered entity” means the distributor of covered products that are sold in or into the state that is licensed as a wholesaler, as defined in Section 4043 of the Business and Professions Code, but does not include a warehouse of a retail pharmacy chain that is licensed as a wholesaler if it engages only in intracompany transfers between any division, affiliate, subsidiary, parent, or other entity under complete common ownership and control.

(C) If no entity that meets the definition in subparagraph (A) or (B) is in the state, “covered entity” means a repackager, as defined in Section 4044 of the Business and Professions Code, of covered
 products that are sold in or into the state.

(D) If no entity that meets the definition in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) is in the state, “covered entity” means the owner or licensee of a trademark or brand under which covered products are sold in or into the state, regardless of whether the trademark is registered.

(E) If no entity that meets the definition in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) is in the state, “covered entity” means the importer of the covered products that are sold in or into the state.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations on the process for determining what entity is a covered entity following the priority order set forth in paragraph (1).

(g) “Covered product” means a covered drug or home-generated sharps waste.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, and any successor agency.

(i) “Distributor” means a wholesaler, as that term is defined in Section 4043 of the Business and Professions Code.

(j) “Drug” means any of the following:

(1) An article recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, the official National Formulary, the official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement of the formulary or those pharmacopoeias.

(2) A substance intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals.

(3) A substance, other
 than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals.

(4) A substance intended for use as a component of any substance specified in this subdivision.

(k) “Generic drug” means a drug that is chemically identical or bioequivalent to a brand name drug in dosage form, safety, strengths, route of administration, quality, performance, characteristics, and intended use, though inactive ingredients may vary.

(l) (1) “Home-generated sharps waste” has the same meaning as defined in Section 117671 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Home-generated sharps waste” does not include either of the following:

(A) Components manufactured for
 use with external ambulatory insulin pump therapy systems or continuous glucose monitoring systems, including, but not limited to, insulin infusion sets, glucose sensors that are sterile goods indicated for single subcutaneous use, sterile drug delivery channels indicated for single subcutaneous use, and injection ports.

(B) A biological product, as defined in Section 262(i)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, including a combination product, as defined in Section 3.2(e) of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(m) “Mail-back program” means a method of collecting covered products from ultimate users by using prepaid, preaddressed mailing envelopes as described in Section 1776.2 of Article 9.1 of Division 17 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(n) “Nonprescription drug” means any drug that
 may be lawfully sold without a prescription.

(o) “Pharmacy” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4037 of the Business and Professions Code.

(p) “Prescription drug” means a drug, including, but not limited to, a controlled substance, that is required under federal or state law to be dispensed with a prescription, or is restricted to use by practitioners only.

(q) “Program operator” means a covered entity, or stewardship organization on behalf of a group of covered entities, that is responsible for operating a stewardship program in accordance with this chapter.

(r) “Proprietary information” means information that is all of the following:

(1) Submitted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A trade secret, or commercial or financial information, that is privileged or confidential, and is identified as such by the entity providing the information to the department.

(3) Not required to be disclosed under any other law or any regulation affecting a covered product or covered entity.

(s) “Retail pharmacy” means an independent pharmacy, a supermarket pharmacy, a chain pharmacy, or a mass merchandiser pharmacy possessing a license from the state board to operate a pharmacy.

(t) “Retail pharmacy chain” means a retail pharmacy with five or more stores in the state.

(u) “Sharps” means hypodermic needles, pen needles, intravenous needles, lancets, and other devices that are used to
 penetrate the skin for the delivery of medications.

(v) “State board” means the California State Board of Pharmacy.

(w) “Stewardship organization” means an organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) that is established by a group of covered entities in accordance with this chapter to develop, implement, and administer a stewardship program established pursuant to this chapter.

(x) “Stewardship plan,” or “plan” means the plan for collecting and properly managing covered products that is developed by a covered entity or stewardship organization pursuant to this chapter.

(y) “Stewardship program” means a stewardship program for the collection, transportation, and
 disposal of covered products.

(z) “Ultimate user” means a state resident or other nonbusiness entity and includes a person who has lawfully obtained, and who possesses, a covered product, including a controlled substance, for the person’s own use or for the use of a member of the person’s household. “Ultimate user” does not include a needle exchange program established under Section 121349 of the Health and Safety Code, or a medical waste generator, as defined in Section 117705 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 229.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Covered Entities and Stewardship Organizations [42031. - 42031.6.]

42031.

(a) (1) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, a covered entity shall provide a list of covered products, and a list and description of any drugs or sharps that are not covered products, that it sells or offers for sale in the state to the state board.

(2) A covered entity, or a stewardship organization on behalf of a group of covered entities, shall update the lists described in paragraph (1) and provide the updated lists to the state board on or before January 15 of each year or upon request of the department.

(b) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, a retail pharmacy that sells a covered product under its own label shall
 provide written notification to the state board identifying the covered entity from which the retail pharmacy obtains a covered product that the retail pharmacy sells under its store label.

(c) The state board shall verify the information received pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) and make it available to the department upon request.

(d) The state board may issue a letter of inquiry to any entity listed in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 42030 requesting a list of all drugs and sharps it distributes in California, regardless of whether the drugs or sharps are covered under this chapter, the name of the manufacturer of such products, and any additional information necessary to carry out this chapter. An entity that is issued a letter of inquiry pursuant to this subdivision shall respond in writing no later than 60 days after
 receipt of the letter. Responses to those inquiries may be shared with the department, but are otherwise deemed proprietary and exempt from disclosure. If the entity does not believe it is a covered entity for purposes of this chapter, it shall submit all of the following to the state board in response to the letter of inquiry:

(1) The basis for the claim that it is not a covered entity.

(2) A list of any drugs and sharps it sells, distributes, repackages, or otherwise offers for sale within the state.

(3) If applicable, the name and contact information of the person or entity from which it obtains a drug or sharp identified pursuant to paragraph (2).

(e) The state board shall obtain and verify and, within 30 days of receipt or upon request by the
 department, submit to the department a list of drugs and sharps sold or offered for sale in the state excluded from the definition of “covered drugs” pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 42030 or excluded from the definition of “home-generated sharps waste” in subdivision (l) of Section 42030.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 42036.4, information submitted by the state board to the department under this chapter may include proprietary information.

(g) The state board shall notify the department if any covered entity or stewardship organization is in violation of this section for purposes of enforcement by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 230.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42031.2.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations for the implementation of this chapter with an effective date of no later than January 1, 2021.

(b) The state board may adopt regulations for the administration of the portions of this chapter for which it has been given responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42031.4.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 42035, a covered entity is not in compliance with this chapter and is subject to penalties pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 42035) if, commencing one year from the adoption of regulations pursuant to Section 42031.2, a covered product sold or offered for sale by the covered entity is not subject to an approved stewardship plan, which is submitted by the covered entity or by a stewardship organization that includes the covered entity, that has been approved by the department pursuant to Section 42032.

(b) In order to comply with the requirements of this chapter, a covered entity may establish and implement a stewardship program independently, or as part of a group of covered entities through
 membership in a stewardship organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 231.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42031.6.

(a) A program operator shall conduct a comprehensive education and outreach program intended to promote participation in the stewardship program. At a minimum, the education and outreach program shall do all of the following:

(1) Promote its stewardship program to ultimate users by providing signage for hospitals, pharmacies, and other locations, as necessary.

(2) Provide educational and outreach materials for persons authorized to prescribe drugs, pharmacies, pharmacists, ultimate users, and others, as necessary.

(3) Establish an Internet Web site that publicizes the location of authorized collectors and
 provides other information intended to promote the use of the stewardship program.

(4) Prepare and provide additional outreach materials not specified in this section, as needed to promote the collection and proper management of covered drugs and home-generated sharps waste.

(5) Encourage ultimate users to separate products that are not covered products from covered products, when appropriate, before submitting the covered products to an authorized collection site or mail-back program.

(b) A program operator shall not, as part of the education and outreach program, promote the disposal of a covered product in a manner inconsistent with the services offered to ultimate users by the stewardship program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Stewardship Plans [42032. - 42032.2.]

42032.

(a) (1) Within six months of the adoption date of regulations by the department pursuant to Section 42031.2, a program operator shall submit to the department for approval a complete stewardship plan that meets the requirements of Section 42032.2 for the establishment and implementation of a stewardship program, in a format determined by the department.

(2) The department shall approve a proposed stewardship program if the program operator submits a completed plan that meets the requirements of this section.

(b) (1) Before submitting a stewardship plan to the department pursuant to this section, a program operator shall submit its
 proposed stewardship plan to the state board for review, and to any other applicable state agencies with areas of authority relative to the stewardship plan. The duration of time that the state board takes to review a stewardship plan pursuant to this paragraph shall not count toward the time limit specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) An agency that receives a plan shall review the plan for compliance with state and federal laws and regulations related to the agency’s respective authority. The agency shall determine compliance or noncompliance with those laws and regulations, and provide to the program operator that determination and an explanation for any finding of noncompliance, within 90 days of receipt of the plan.

(3) A program operator may submit an updated proposed plan to an agency that issued a determination of noncompliance to attempt to obtain a
 determination of compliance. A program operator shall submit any determination received from an agency when it submits its stewardship plan to the department.

(4) If, 90 days after submitting a plan to an applicable agency, a program operator has not received a response from the applicable agency, the program operator may submit a certification to the department that the stewardship plan is consistent with all other applicable laws and regulations.

(c) (1) The department shall determine if a stewardship plan is complete, including the determinations required pursuant to subdivision (b), and notify the submitting program operator within 30 days of receipt.

(2) If the department finds that the stewardship plan is complete, the department’s 90-day review period for consideration of approval of the
 plan set forth in subdivision (d) shall commence upon the original date of receipt.

(3) If the department determines the stewardship plan is incomplete, the department shall identify for the program operator the required additional information, and the program operator shall resubmit the plan within 30 days.

(4) If the department determines upon resubmission that the stewardship plan is complete, the department’s 90-day review period for consideration of approval of the plan shall commence upon the date of receipt of the resubmitted plan.

(d) (1) The department shall review a complete submitted stewardship plan and shall approve, disapprove, or conditionally approve the plan within 90 days of receipt of the complete plan.

(2) The
 department may consult with, or submit a stewardship plan for review to, the state board or another state agency it determines is necessary to determine the completeness of the stewardship plan or for making a determination on the approval of the stewardship plan or an amendment to the stewardship plan. The duration of time that the department takes to review a stewardship plan pursuant to this paragraph shall not count toward the 90-day time limit specified in paragraph (1).

(e) A program operator shall submit any significant changes to a stewardship plan in writing for approval by the department, and shall not implement the changes prior to that approval.

(f) (1) If the department disapproves a submitted stewardship plan pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall explain, in writing within 30 days, how the plan does not comply with this chapter, and
 the program operator shall resubmit a revised plan to the department.

(2) If the department finds that the revised stewardship plan submitted by the program operator does not comply with the requirements of this chapter and disapproves the plan, the covered entity operating its own stewardship program, or the stewardship organization and the covered entities that are members of the stewardship organization, are not in compliance with this chapter until the program operator submits a plan that the department approves.

(g) A program operator shall fully implement operation of an approved stewardship program no later than 270 days after approval by the department of the stewardship plan that establishes the stewardship program.

(h) If a stewardship plan is revoked pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42035.4 or
 terminated by the program operator that submitted the plan, a covered entity no longer subject to that plan may, without being subject to penalties pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 42035), sell or offer for sale covered products in the state for a period of up to one year after the plan terminated or was revoked if the covered entity continues to operate under the most recent approved stewardship plan to which the covered entity was subject.

(i) The department shall make all stewardship plans submitted pursuant to this section available to the public, except proprietary information in the plans protected pursuant to Section 42036.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42032.2.

(a) (1) To be complete, a stewardship plan for covered drugs shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify and provide contact information for the stewardship organization, if applicable, and each participating covered entity, and identify each covered drug sold or offered for sale by each participating covered entity.

(B) Identify and provide contact information for the authorized collectors for the stewardship program, as well as the reasons for excluding any potential authorized collectors from participation in the program.

(C) Include any determinations provided by a state agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42032. Any determination of noncompliance shall be accompanied by a superseding determination of compliance.

(D) Demonstrate adequate funding for all administrative and operational costs of the stewardship program, to be borne by participating covered entities.

(E) Provide for a handling, transport, and disposal system that complies with applicable state and federal laws, including, but not limited to, regulations adopted by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration.

(F) Provide for a collection system that complies with the requirements of this chapter and meets all of the following requirements for authorized collection sites in each county in which the plan will be implemented:

(i) Provides for a minimum of five authorized collection sites or one authorized collection site per 50,000 people, whichever is greater.

(ii) Provides for a reasonable geographic spread of authorized collection sites and an explanation for the geographic spread.

(iii) Provides for a mail-back program covering any counties where there is not an authorized retail pharmacy operating as an authorized collection site.

(G) Require a program operator to do all of the following:

(i) Permit an ultimate user who is a homeless, homebound, or disabled individual to request prepaid, preaddressed mailing envelopes, or an alternative form of a collection and disposal system, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), that would render the covered drug inert. A program operator shall accept that request through an Internet Web site and toll-free telephone number that it shall maintain to comply with the requests.

(ii) Provide alternative methods of collection from ultimate users for any covered drugs, other than controlled substances, that cannot be accepted or commingled with other covered drugs in secure collection receptacles or through a mail-back program, to the extent technically feasible and permissible under applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, United States Drug Enforcement Administration regulations.

(iii) (I) Provide a service schedule that meets the needs of each authorized collection site to ensure that each secure collection receptacle is serviced as often as necessary to avoid reaching capacity and that collected covered drugs are transported to final disposal in a timely manner. Additionally, a receipt or collection manifest shall be left with the authorized collection site to support verification of the service. The authorized collection site shall maintain and make available to the department this documentation.

(II) An authorized collector shall comply with applicable federal and state laws regarding collection and transportation standards, and the handling of covered drugs, including United States Drug Enforcement Administration regulations.

(H) Provide the policies and procedures for the safe and secure collection, transporting, and disposing of the covered drug, describe how and where records will be maintained and how, at a minimum, instances of security problems that occur will be addressed, and explain the processes that will be taken to change the policies, procedures, and tracking mechanisms to alleviate the problems and to improve safety and security.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply only with regard to covered drugs.

(b) (1) At least 120 days before submitting a stewardship plan to the department, the operator of a stewardship program for covered drugs shall notify potential authorized collectors in the county or counties in which it operates of the opportunity to serve as an authorized collector for the proposed stewardship program. If a potential authorized collector expresses interest in participating in a stewardship program, the program operator shall commence good faith negotiations with the potential authorized collector within 30 days.

(2) A retail pharmacy shall make a reasonable effort to serve as an authorized collector as part of a stewardship program in the county in which it is located. If the minimum threshold described in clause (i) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not met in each county in which a retail pharmacy
 chain has store locations, the retail pharmacy chain shall have at least one location or 15 percent of its store locations, whichever is greater, in that county serve as authorized collectors in a stewardship program.

(3) A program operator shall include as an authorized collector under its stewardship program any entity listed in subdivision (b) of Section 42030 that offers to participate in the stewardship program, in writing and without compensation, even if the minimum convenience standards set in clause (i) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) have been achieved. The program operator shall include the offering entity as an authorized collector in the program within 90 days of receiving the written offer to participate. A program operator shall not be required to respond to offers pursuant to this paragraph until the program operator’s stewardship plan has been approved by the department.

(c) After a stewardship plan for covered drugs has been approved, the program operator may supplement service, if approved by the department, for a county in which it operates that does not have the minimum number of authorized collection sites due to circumstances beyond the program operator’s control, by establishing one or both of the following: 

(1) A mail-back program. The mail-back program may include providing information on where and how to receive mail-back materials or providing the locations at which it distributes prepaid, preaddressed mailing envelopes. The program operator shall propose the locations of those envelope distribution locations as part of the stewardship plan. Prepaid mailing envelopes may be mailed to an ultimate user upon request.

(2) An alternative form of collection and disposal of covered drugs that complies with applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, United States Drug Enforcement Administration regulations.

(d) (1) To be complete, a stewardship plan for home-generated sharps waste shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify and provide contact information for the stewardship organization, if applicable, and each participating covered entity, and identify each covered product sold or offered for sale by each participating covered entity.

(B) Include any determinations provided by a state agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42032. Any determination of noncompliance shall be accompanied by a superseding determination of compliance.

(C) Demonstrate adequate funding for all administrative and operational costs of the stewardship program, to be borne by participating covered entities.

(D) Provide for a handling, transport, and disposal system, at no cost to the ultimate user, that complies with applicable state and federal laws.

(E) Maintain an Internet Web site and toll-free telephone number for purposes of providing information on the program, including disposal options, and to receive requests for sharps waste containers from ultimate users.

(F) Provide that a stewardship program for home-generated sharps waste shall be a mail-back program for home-generated sharps waste that complies with this chapter and that meets all the following requirements:

(i) The program provides or initiates distribution of a sharps waste container and mail-back materials at the point of sale, to the extent allowable by law. Containers and mail-back materials shall be provided at no cost to the ultimate user. The program operator shall select and distribute a container and mail-back materials sufficient to accommodate the volume of sharps purchased by an ultimate user over a selected time period.

(I) For any sharps, the packaging, an insert or instructions, or separate information provided to the ultimate user shall include information on proper sharps waste disposal.

(II) All sharps waste containers shall include on a label affixed to the container or packaging, or on a separate insert included in the container or packaging, the program operator’s Internet Web site and toll-free telephone number.

(III) All sharps waste containers shall include prepaid postage affixed to the container or to the mail-back packaging.

(ii) Upon request, the program provides for reimbursement to local agencies for disposal costs related to home-generated sharps waste, unless the program operator provides for the removal of the home-generated sharps waste from the local household hazardous waste facility.

(I) A local agency shall not knowingly request reimbursement for disposal expenses pursuant to this subparagraph for disposal costs resulting from a municipal needle exchange program or a medical waste generator.

(II) Reimbursement costs shall be limited to the actual costs of transportation from the household hazardous waste facility and for the actual costs of disposal.

(III) A request for reimbursement pursuant to this clause shall be submitted with a declaration under penalty of perjury that the local agency has not knowingly requested reimbursement for expenses prohibited by this section.

(IV) A cost is eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this clause if the cost is incurred 270 days or more after the approval of a stewardship plan for home-generated sharps waste.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply only with regard to home-generated sharps waste.

(e) A stewardship plan shall include provisions to expand into jurisdictions not included in the stewardship plan pursuant to Section 42036.2, in the event a jurisdiction repeals its local stewardship program ordinance.

(f) A stewardship plan shall include educational and outreach provisions to meet the requirements of Section 42031.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reports, Budgets, and Records [42033. - 42033.6.]

42033.

With the submission of a stewardship plan, a program operator shall submit to the department an initial stewardship program budget for the first five calendar years of operation of its stewardship program that includes both of the following:

(a) Total anticipated revenues and costs of implementing the stewardship program.

(b) A total recommended funding level sufficient to cover the plan’s budgeted costs and to operate the stewardship program over a multiyear period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.   (SB 212)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42033.2.

(a) On or before March 31, 2022, and each year thereafter, a program operator shall prepare and submit to the department both of the following:

(1) A written report describing the stewardship program activities during the previous reporting period of one year.

(2) A written program budget for stewardship program implementation for the upcoming calendar year.

(b) An annual report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall include, at a minimum, all of the following for the prior year:

(1) A list of covered entities participating in
 the stewardship organization.

(2) The updated and reverified list provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42031 of covered products that each covered entity subject to the stewardship plan sells or offers for sale.

(3) The amount, by weight, of covered products collected from ultimate users at each authorized collection site that is part of the stewardship program.

(4) For a stewardship plan for covered drugs, the name and location of authorized collection sites at which covered drugs were collected.

(5) For a stewardship plan for home-generated sharps waste, information on the mail-back program.

(6) Whether policies and procedures for collecting, transporting, and
 disposing of covered products, as established in the stewardship plan, were followed during the reporting period and a description of each instance of noncompliance, if any occurred.

(7) Whether any safety or security problems occurred during collection, transportation, or disposal of collected covered products during the reporting period and, if so, what changes have been or will be made to policies, procedures, or tracking mechanisms to alleviate the problem and to improve safety and security.

(8) How the program operator complied with all elements in its stewardship plan.
